Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-7,120
Lung cancer screening; deductible, coinsurance, cost-sharing requirements; prohibited, when.

Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, beginning January 1, 2025, no policy, certificate, or contract, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state, or any self-funded employee benefit plan, to the extent not preempted by federal law, shall impose a deductible, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing requirements for lung cancer screening, including screening performed with low-dose computed tomography, for an individual at least fifty years of age and not older than eighty years of age who has a twenty-pack-per-year smoking history and currently smokes or who has quit smoking within the past fifteen years. This section shall not apply if an individual (1) has not smoked for fifteen years, (2) develops a health problem that substantially limits life expectancy, or (3) is preparing to have curative lung surgery.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 16.